Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-1191
Legislative appropriation; department;
provide grants to establish bridge programs.

The Legislature shall appropriate
two hundred thousand dollars each fiscal year for three consecutive fiscal
years beginning with FY2012-13 to the department from the Education Innovation
Fund to provide grants to establish bridge programs. Such programs shall:

(1)
Provide English reading and writing and math skills required to succeed in
a postsecondary educational credentialing or degree program;

(2)
Lead to the attainment of college credit and a recognized postsecondary educational
credential or an industry-recognized credential;

(3) Be open only
to low-income participants who are co-enrolled in adult education, developmental
education, or English as a second language;

(4) Target the specific workforce needs
of an occupational sector within the state and provide services aimed at improving
education, skills, and employment prospects for low-income adults;

(5)
Use educational best practices, including, but not limited to, contextualized
instructional strategies, team teaching, modularized learning, or reduced
student-teacher ratios; and

(6) Provide for supportive services needed
for student educational and employment success, including, but not limited
to, job coaching and personal needs.

Laws 2012, LB1079, § 3.
April 7, 2012